scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_n.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     abashkwebiigininjiishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabashkwebiigininjiishin
     abashkwebiigininjiishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabashkwebiigininjiishin
     abashkwebiigininjiishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabashkwebiigininjiishin
     abashkwebiigininjiishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abashkwebiigininjiishing
     abashkwebiigininjiishin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebashkwebiigininjiishing
     abashkwebiigizideshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabashkwebiigizideshin
     abashkwebiigizideshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabashkwebiigizideshin
     abashkwebiigizideshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabashkwebiigizideshin
     abashkwebiigizideshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abashkwebiigizideshing
     abashkwebiigizideshin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebashkwebiigizideshing
     agawaatebiigishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagawaatebiigishin
     agawaatebiigishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagawaatebiigishin
     agawaatebiigishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidagawaatebiigishin
     agawaatebiigishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agawaatebiigishin
     agawaatebiigishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agawaatebiigishing
     agawaatebiigishin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egawaatebiigishing
     agawaateshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagawaateshin
     agawaateshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagawaateshin
     agawaateshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidagawaateshin
     agawaateshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agawaateshin
     agawaateshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agawaateshing
     agawaateshin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egawaateshing
     agonjin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagonjin
     agonjin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagonjin
     agonjin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidagonjin
     agonjin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agonjin
     agonjin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agonjing
     agonjin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egonjing
     agoojin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagoojin
     agoojin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagoojin
     agoojin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ndagoojin
     agoojin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agoojin 
     agoojin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agoojing
     agoojin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egoojing
     agwanjin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indagwanjin
     agwanjin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindagwanjin
     agwanjin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidagwanjin
     agwanjin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwanjin
     agwanjin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwanjing
     agwanjin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egwanjing
     agwaagwaabikishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaagwaabikishin
     agwaagwaabikishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: agwaagwaabikishing
     agwaagwaabikishin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: egwaagwaabikishing
     ajidagoojin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ajidagoojin
     ajidagoojin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ajidagoojing
     ajidagoojin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ejidagoojing
     anibeshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anibeshin
     anibeshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anibeshing
     anibeshin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enibeshing
     animikoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanimikoshin
     animikoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanimikoshin
     animikoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanimikoshin
     animikoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animikoshin 
     animikoshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animikoshing
     animikoshin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimikoshing
     animwewekamigishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animwewekamigishin
     animwewekamigishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animwewekamigishing
     animwewekamigishin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimwewekamigishing
     animweweshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animweweshin
     animweweshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animweweshing
     animweweshin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimweweshing
     anweshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanweshin
     anweshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanweshin
     anweshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanweshin
     anweshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anweshin 
     anweshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anweshing
     anweshin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enweshing
     apangishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indapangishin
     apangishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindapangishin
     apangishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidapangishin
     apangishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apangishin
     apangishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apangishing
     apangishin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: epangishing
     apishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apishin
     apishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apishing
     apishin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: epishing
     apizideshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indapizideshin
     apizideshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindapizideshin
     apizideshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidapizideshin
     apizideshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apizideshing
     apiichishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiichishin 
     apiichishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl: aapiichishinoog
     apiichishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiichishing
     apiichishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl: aapiichishinowaad
     apiichishin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: epiichishing
     apiichishin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Pl: epiichishinowaad
     apiitagoojin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiitagoojin
     apiitagoojin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiitagoojing
     apiitagoojin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: epiitagoojing
     ashawegonjin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ashawegonjin
     ashawegonjin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ashawegonjing
     ashawegonjin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eshawegonjing
     ashawekweshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indashawekweshin
     ashawekweshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ashawekweshin
     ashawekweshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ashawekweshing
     ashawekweshin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eshawekweshing
     ashidaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ashidaakoshin
     ashidaakoshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ashidaakoshing
     ashidaakoshin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eshidaakoshing
     aabidaanagidoon+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaabidaanagidoon
     aabidaanagidoon+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaabidaanagidoon
     aabidaanagidoon+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaabidaanagidoon
     aabidaanagidoon+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabidaanagidoon
     aabidaanagidoon+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabidaanagidoong
     aabidaanagidoon+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaabidaanagidoong
     aabiziishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaabiziishin
     aabiziishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaabiziishin
     aabiziishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaabiziishin
     aabiziishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabiziishin
     aabiziishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabiziishing
     aaboodagoojin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaaboodagoojin
     aaboodagoojin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aaboodagoojin
     aaboodagoojin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aaboodagoojing
     aaboodagoojin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaaboodagoojing
     aadaabikishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaadaabikishin
     aadaabikishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaadaabikishin
     aadaabikishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaadaabikishin
     aadaabikishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aadaabikishing
     aadaagoneshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaadaagoneshin
     aadaagoneshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaadaagoneshin
     aadaagoneshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aadaagoneshin
     aadaagoneshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aadaagoneshing
     aadaagoneshin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaadaagoneshing
     aadaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaadaakoshin
     aadaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaadaakoshin
     aadaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaadaakoshin
     aadaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aadaakoshin
     aadaakoshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aadaakoshing
     aanikooshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aanikooshin
     aanikooshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aanikooshing
     aanikooshin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaanikooshing
     aanjishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaanjishin
     aanjishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaanjishin
     aanjishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaanjishin
     aanjishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aanjishin
     aanjishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aanjishing
     aanwaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaanwaakoshin
     aanwaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aanwaakoshin
     aanwaakoshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aanwaakoshing
     aapijishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaapijishin
     aapijishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaapijishin
     aapijishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaapijishin
     aapijishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aapijishin
     aapijishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aapijishing
     aapijishin+VAI+Particip+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaapijishing
     aasamaateshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aasamaateshin
     aasamaateshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aasamaateshing
     aasamishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaasamishin
     aasamishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaasamishin
     aasamishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaasamishin
     aasamishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aasamishin
     aasamishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aasamishing
     aasoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaasoshin
     aasoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaasoshin
     aasoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaasoshin
     aasoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aasoshin
     aasoshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aasoshing
     aaswaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aaswaakoshin
     aaswaakoshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aaswaakoshing
     aaswaakoshin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaaswakoshing
     aaswaawiganeshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaaswaawiganeshin
     aaswaawiganeshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aaswaawiganeshin
     aaswaawiganeshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aaswaawiganeshing
     aatwaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaatwaakoshin
     aatwaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaatwaakoshin
     aatwaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaatwaakoshin
     aatwaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aatwaakoshin
     aatwaakoshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aatwaakoshing
     aatwaakoshin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaatwaakoshing
     aazhawaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaazhawaakoshin
     aazhawaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawaakoshin
     aazhawaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaazhawaakoshin
     aazhawaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl: aazhawaakoshinoog
     aazhawaakoshin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaakoshin
     aazhawaakoshin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaakoshing
     aazhawaakoshin+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaazhawaakoshing
     aazhawaakwagwinjin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaakwagwinjin
     aazhawaakwagwinjin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaakwagwinjing
